Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6112
Continuation of corporate existence.

Corporate existence of a mutual insurer converting to a stock insurer pursuant to the Insurers Demutualization Act shall not terminate, but the new stock insurer shall be deemed to be a continuation of the mutual insurer and to have been organized on the date the mutual insurer was originally organized.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 52.